District of Columbia statutes.
44-1708

Compensation for telephone solicitation prohibited.

No person shall for pecuniary compensation or consideration conduct or make any solicitation by telephone for or on behalf of any actual or purported charitable use, purpose, association, corporation, or institution.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 281, Pub. L. 85-87, § 9
1973 Ed., § 2-2108.
1981 Ed., § 2-708.
This section is referenced in § 44-1703.